Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Municipal Streets

54-5-201. State highways routed through municipalities — Contracting regarding rights-of-way.

The department shall construct, reconstruct and improve streets and maintain the streets in municipalities over which traffic on state highways is routed; or enter into contracts with the municipalities in the state regarding the construction, reconstruction and improvement of streets and maintenance of the streets in municipalities over which traffic on state highways is routed, and is authorized to enter into contracts with municipalities regarding the acquisition of rights-of-way for those streets, and is authorized to expend state or federal funds, or both, in carrying out this section; provided, that where any federal funds are used in the construction or reconstruction of any street, the municipality shall first agree to comply with, and conform to, all federal and state requirements with reference to traffic regulations and street markings.

The state shall pay all the costs for any highway or parts of the highway designated and adopted by the department as and for a state or state and federal aid highway in the state's system of highways; provided, that a municipality may contribute sums that may be approved by its governing body to the cost.

No municipality shall be required to pay or enter into an agreement to pay any part of the costs.

However, the state's obligation for maintenance of its system of highways shall be governed by those limitations now set out by law, it being the intent of this section neither to enlarge nor to diminish present obligations for this maintenance.

Acts 1929, ch. 42, § 1; Code 1932, § 3242; Acts 1947, ch. 123, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3242; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1963, ch. 126, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-531; Acts 1987, ch. 180, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335.

Attorney General Opinions. Highway storm drainage maintenance, OAG 04-029 (2/25/04).

54-5-202. Width and character of highways in municipalities.

The streets constructed, reconstructed, improved and maintained by the state shall be of a width and type that the department deems proper, but the width so constructed, reconstructed, improved and maintained shall not be less than eighteen feet (18'); and, in the case of resurfacing and maintenance, from curb to curb where curbs exist, or the full width of the roadway where no curbs exist.

Acts 1929, ch. 42, § 2; Code 1932, § 3243; Acts 1947, ch. 123, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3243; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-532; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cited: McDonald v. Scott County, 169 Tenn. 374, 87 S.W.2d 1019, 1935 Tenn. LEXIS 58 (1935).

54-5-203. Maintenance by municipality — Reimbursement.

Where a municipality is organized for the care of its own streets, the construction, reconstruction, improvement and maintenance may be done by the municipality, which shall be reimbursed by the state; provided, that all expenditures shall be subject to the approval of the department.

Acts 1929, ch. 42, § 3; Code 1932, § 3244; Acts 1947, ch. 123, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3244; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-533; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cited: McDonald v. Scott County, 169 Tenn. 374, 87 S.W.2d 1019, 1935 Tenn. LEXIS 58 (1935).

54-5-204. Maintenance of highway by state.

Where a municipality is not organized to care for its own streets and roads, the construction or maintenance shall be done by the state, either by contract or state forces.

Acts 1929, ch. 42, § 4; Code 1932, § 3245; Acts 1947, ch. 123, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3245; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-534.

54-5-205. Streets for highways designated by department.

The department shall have sole jurisdiction over the selection of the streets through which traffic shall be routed.

Acts 1929, ch. 42, § 5; Code 1932, § 3246; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-535; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 23.

Cited: State ex rel. Morgan County v. Gouge, 194 Tenn. 484, 253 S.W.2d 721, 1952 Tenn. LEXIS 409 (1952).

54-5-206. Interstate highways routed through municipalities — Maintenance by department.

The department is authorized to maintain the rights-of-way, pavement, and structures of streets over which interstate highway traffic is routed within municipalities and designated by the commissioner as part of the interstate and defense system of highways as defined by the Federal Highway Act of 1956; provided, that the department shall have no authority to maintain or operate lighting systems for or on the streets, but cities and municipalities may maintain and operate the systems in accordance with standards prescribed by the commissioner; and provided, further, that they shall be maintained and operated at the expense of the cities and municipalities.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9 § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 15, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-552; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Highway Act of 1956, with certain exceptions, has been repealed and superseded by Title 23 of the United States Code as enacted by Act of August 27, 1958, P. L. 85-767, 72 Stat. at Large 921. For definition of interstate highway see 23 U.S.C. §§ 101, 103(d).

54-5-207. Authority of commissioner upon failure of municipality to enter into or abide by agreement concerning acquisition and use of lands for streets.

In the event any municipality fails or refuses to enter into an agreement within thirty (30) days after the agreement has been submitted by the commissioner to the governing body of the municipal corporation, or fails or refuses to abide by or perform an agreement concerning the acquisition and use of lands for streets needed for the interstate and national defense highway system, and the commissioner decides that the highway and street program is being delayed, impaired, obstructed, or impeded in any manner, the commissioner is authorized and empowered to:

Lay out, locate and construct streets, controlled streets and access or connecting streets within the municipality to become a part of the interstate and national defense system of highways by designation of the commissioner;

Designate lands already dedicated to the use of the traveling public as a part of the interstate and national defense highway system; and

Acquire interests in lands occupied by publicly and privately owned utilities;

Require the adjustment or relocation of the utility facilities;

Enter into contracts relating to the utilities; and

Maintain actions or suits in the courts when necessary so as to lay out, locate or construct streets designated as portions of the interstate and national defense system of highways.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 230, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-553; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 2013, ch. 308, § 8.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “being delayed, impaired” for “being, retarded, delayed” near the end of the introductory paragraph.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-5-208. Eminent domain within municipalities.

In the event it becomes necessary for the commissioner to proceed under this section and §§ 54-5-207, 54-5-209 and 54-5-210, the state, acting through the commissioner, is authorized and empowered to exercise the power of eminent domain within municipalities for streets designated as part of the interstate and national defense system of highways.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1961, ch. 230, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-554; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. State powers of eminent domain relating to rights-of-way and road improvement, §§ 54-22-101, 54-22-104.

54-5-209. Acts of municipality that would cause loss of federal funds prohibited.

No municipality has the authority to enact any ordinance or do any other act that will cause the state to lose federal aid funds for such streets.

Acts 1961, ch. 230, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-555.

54-5-210. Legal status of streets unchanged.

Nothing in this section and §§ 54-5-207 — 54-5-209 shall be construed as otherwise changing the character or legal status of city streets in any way and the distinctions made in this code between streets and highways are continued in full force and effect.

Acts 1961, ch. 230, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-556.

54-5-211. Designation of bicycle routes.

The responsible authority in each municipality may designate and appropriately mark on appropriate municipal streets, or portions of municipal streets, routes for the use of bicycles.

Acts 1994, ch. 909, § 2.

Cross-References. Designation of bicycle routes, §§ 54-5-142, 54-10-111.